test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-A-ihkwa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ihkwa - ok : # -m animate noun, elder AEW NA4, no loc.
     ihkwa+N+A+Sg: ihkwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitihkom
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitihkom
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitihkominân
     ihkwa+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kitihkominaw
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitihkomiwâw

     ihkwa+N+A+Pl: ihkwak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitihkomak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitihkomak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitihkominânak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kitihkominawak
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitihkomiwâwak
     
     ihkwa+N+A+Obv: ihkwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitihkoma
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kitihkoma
     ihkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nitihkominâna
     ihkwa+N+A+Px12Pl+Obv: kitihkominawa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kitihkomiwâwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otihkoma
     ihkwa+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otihkomiwâwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px4Sg+Obv: otihkomiyiwa
     ihkwa+N+A+Px4Pl+Obv: otihkomiyiwa

     
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: ihkos
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [ihkomis, ihkomisis]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nitihkomis, nitihkomisis]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kitihkomis, kitihkomisis]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nitihkomisinân, nitihkomisisinân]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kitihkomisinaw, kitihkomisisinaw]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kitihkomisiwâw, kitihkomisisiwâw]

     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [ayapîmisak, ayapîmisisak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nitihkomisak, nitihkomisisak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kitihkomisak, kitihkomisisak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nitihkomisinânak, nitihkomisisinânak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kitihkomisinawak, kitihkomisisinawak]
     ihkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kitihkomisiwâwak, kitihkomisisiwâwak]
